Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1750YH (7) 91 je/jh H.F. 115 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âCombatting Terrorist Sympathizers Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. Section 256.183, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 3 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 âAccredited private institutionâ means an institution of 5 higher learning located in Iowa which is operated privately 6 and not controlled or administered by any state agency or 7 any subdivision of the state and which meets the criteria in 8 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ and all of the criteria in paragraphs âdâ 9 through âjâ âkâ , except that institutions defined in paragraph 10 âcâ of this subsection are exempt from the requirements of 11 paragraphs âaâ and âbâ : 12 Sec. 3. Section 256.183, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 13 by adding the following new paragraph: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. Adopts a policy for compliance with 15 chapter 261K. 16 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Definitions. 17 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 18 requires: 19 1. âInstitution of higher educationâ means an institution of 20 higher learning governed by the state board of regents or an 21 accredited private institution as defined in section 256.183. 22 2. âNonimmigrant visaâ includes but is not limited to visa 23 categories F-1, M-1, and J-1. 24 3. âTerrorist activityâ and âterrorist organizationâ mean the 25 same as defined in 8 U.S.C. Â§1182. 26 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 261K.2 Policy on nonimmigrant visa 27 holders ââ support of terrorist activities or organizations ââ 28 suspension, expulsion, or termination of employment. 29 Each institution of higher education shall adopt and enforce 30 a policy that does all of the following: 31 1. Prohibits a student, faculty member, and staff member, 32 if the individual holds a nonimmigrant visa, from publicly 33 espousing terrorist activity related to an ongoing conflict or, 34 at any time or place, persuading others to endorse or espouse 35 -1- LSB 1750YH (7) 91 je/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 115 terrorist activity related to an ongoing conflict or to support 1 a terrorist organization unless it is the policy or practice of 2 the United States to support such activity or organization. 3 2. Upon suspecting or receiving a credible allegation 4 that an individual has violated the policy, provides for 5 an investigation of the individual by the institution and, 6 if warranted by the factual results of the investigation, 7 enforcement of the policy against the individual. 8 3. Upon a first finding of guilt of or responsibility for a 9 violation of subsection 1 by a preponderance of the evidence, 10 provides for the suspension of a student or termination of a 11 faculty or staff memberâs employment for at least one year. 12 4. Upon a second finding of guilt of or responsibility for 13 a violation of subsection 1 by a preponderance of the evidence, 14 provides for the expulsion of a student or termination of a 15 faculty or staff memberâs employment permanently. 16 5. Immediately upon suspending or expelling a student 17 or terminating a faculty or staff memberâs employment under 18 subsection 3 or 4, requires the institution to update the 19 individualâs record in the federal department of homeland 20 securityâs student exchange visitor information system or a 21 successor system to show that the individual is no longer 22 enrolled as a full-time student of the institution or employed 23 by the institution. 24 6. Prohibits a student, faculty member, or staff member 25 from transferring to, enrolling at, or becoming employed by the 26 institution if the individual has been suspended, expelled, or 27 terminated from employment by another institution of higher 28 education under subsection 4. 29 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 261K.3 Enforcement against 30 institutions ââ attorney general ââ ineligibility for tuition 31 grants. 32 1. The attorney general shall enforce this chapter and 33 may investigate suspected violations of this chapter by an 34 institution of higher education. 35 -2- LSB 1750YH (7) 91 je/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 115 2. The attorney general may compel production of documents 1 and other evidence from an institution suspected of violating 2 this chapter, including all education and employment records 3 and other relevant records. 4 3. a. The attorney general may bring an action against 5 an institution of higher education for a writ of mandamus to 6 compel the institution to comply with this chapter. 7 b. Upon a determination by the court that an institution 8 of higher education that is not a regents institution has 9 violated this chapter, the institution shall be ineligible to 10 receive funds from the state for tuition grants under chapter 11 256, subchapter VII, part 4, subpart B, for the academic year 12 beginning after the date of the finding. The attorney general 13 shall petition the court to make such a determination. The 14 court shall submit a copy of the determination to the college 15 student aid commission. 16 Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect December 31, 17 2025. 18